California statutes. Business and Professions Code
It is unlawful for any person to sell or advertise for sale any dressed poultry or any other fowl or rabbit in dressed form, either cooked or uncooked, or smoked, fresh, frozen, cooked, dried, or pickled meats or fish other than by weight determined at the time of sale on a scale properly sealed in accordance with this division. Any commodity specified in this section, however, need not be weighed at the time of sale if at that time it is packed in a package or container upon which appears the net weight of the commodity therein. Except as provided below, any person, including, but not limited to, a manufacturer, processor,
 packer, wholesaler, or jobber that packs any commodity specified in this section in any package which is intended for retail sale, shall mark the net weight of the commodity therein upon the package. Packages of these products intended for retail sale need not be marked by the packer with the net weight of the commodity if they are to be marked with the net weight of the commodity by the retailer who purchases or receives the packages from the packer. This section does not apply to any of the following ready-to-eat food items:

(a) Items sold for consumption on the premises.

(b) Items sold as one of three or more different elements, excluding condiments, comprising a ready-to-eat meal sold as a unit, for consumption elsewhere than on the premises where sold.

(c) Ready-to-eat meat, poultry, or seafood cooked or heated
 on the premises but not packaged in advance of sale.

(d) Sandwiches when offered or exposed for sale on the premises where packed or produced and not intended for resale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1516, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.55.

Packages of meat, fish, or poultry offered for sale by door-to-door salespersons shall display the price per pound for each type and cut in the package. The price per pound shall be separately and accurately stated and shall be preceded by the words “price per pound” on each principal display panel of the package, as the term “principal display panel” is defined by regulations of the director adopted pursuant to Section 12610. All numbers and letters of the price per pound shall be of uniform size, at least one-quarter inch (6.35 millimeters) in height, and shall be generally parallel to the net quantity statement. There shall in addition be an area
 surrounding the statement of price at least equal in width to the height of the letters and numbers in the statement of price which shall be free of any printed material.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 532, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.6.

No person, firm, corporation, or association shall advertise, solicit, or represent by any means, a product for sale or purchase if it is intended to entice a consumer into a transaction different from that originally represented.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 907.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.7.

Any person who sells meat directly to the consumer on the basis of primal cuts or carcass weight shall supply the buyer with an accurate statement of weight at time of sale of the carcass or primal cut purchased, and shall supply a complete and accurate statement which shall contain the weight of the meat delivered to the buyer and the number and type of cuts. When any fruits, vegetables, or other food products are sold as part of a combination sale with meat sold directly to the consumer on the basis of primal cuts or carcass weight, the seller shall supply an itemized statement showing the net quantity of any fruits, vegetables, and other food products delivered to the
 buyer. This section shall also apply to any person who custom cuts any meat animal carcass or part of such carcass for the owner, except the carcass of any game mammal taken as authorized by the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1449.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.8.

The provisions of Section 12024.5 shall not apply to fish not used for human consumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 141.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.9.

(a) All terms contained in this section which are defined by the United States Department of Agriculture shall have the same meaning as defined by such department.

(b) “Retail cuts” as used in this section shall mean a cut of meat from a primal cut for direct sale to the consumer.

(c) “Freezer meat” as used in this section means any uncooked meat which is sold directly to the consumer on the basis of primal cuts, carcass weight or any specified portion of a carcass, other than retail cuts.

(d) “Variety pack” as used in this section means freezer meat cut or packaged, or both, into retail cuts or other frozen food products, or both, sold for a stipulated total price.

(e) “Consumer” as used in this section means any purchaser of freezer meat or variety pack meat.

(f) Whenever any retail cuts of meat are sold in a variety pack the retailer shall furnish, at the time of sale, an itemization of the total net weight of each of the various retail cuts sold and the total net weight of the entire meat purchase, and a separate itemization shall be furnished for frozen food products other than meat indicating price and weight of each product.

(g) Whenever freezer meat is sold directly to the consumer, the consumer shall be supplied at the time of sale
 with the weight of the carcass or primal cuts before cutting and a complete and accurate inventory which shall contain the net weight of meat delivered. The consumer shall also be supplied with complete cutting instructions for each cut of meat processed and an exact inventory of each such cut. The consumer shall also be furnished with the total weight of ground meat from carcass or primal cuts.

(h) A half of beef shall consist of a forequarter and a hindquarter from the same animal. When beef is sold as a half of beef, the consumer shall be furnished an invoice listing the weight of each such quarter. Not more than 8 percent tolerance differential shall be allowed.

(i) Whenever the consumer buys freezer meats or variety packs, the entire order shall be delivered to the consumer or held and maintained in storage and available for such consumer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.10.

A true and legible copy of each document issued pursuant to Section 12024.7 or 12024.9 shall be retained by the person, company, or corporation issuing the document for a period of one year and shall be made available for inspection by a sealer upon request. This section shall not apply to primal cuts of meat which are smaller than one quarter of a carcass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.11.

The secretary shall adopt necessary rules and regulations pertaining to the sale or advertisement of wood for fuel purposes in order to standardize quantities of measurement and to protect against deceptive marketing practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 20.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.13.

(a) A dealer of a beverage in a container subject to Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500) of the Public Resources Code shall not charge an amount for a redemption payment for a beverage container that is greater than the amount set forth in Section 14560 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, “dealer” has the same meaning as in Section 14510 of the Public Resources
 Code.

(c) A violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) when the overcharge is one dollar ($1) or less.

(d) In the written report required pursuant to Section 12209, a sealer shall separately report any action taken to enforce this section that results in a penalty being levied for a violation of this section.

(e) Nothing in this section is intended to limit or alter the authority of the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery under the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction Act (Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12025.

Any person, who by himself, or his employee or agent, or as a proprietor or manager, refuses to exhibit any commodity being sold at a given weight or quantity, or ordinarily so sold, to a sealer for the purpose of allowing the same to be proved as to the quantity thereof is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12025.5.

Whenever any commodity or any container is ordered off sale under the provisions of Section 12211 or Section 12607 of this division, the sealer shall cause the commodity or container affected by such off-sale order to be identified by a tag or other suitable device with the words “off sale.” It shall be unlawful to remove or obliterate any such tag or device placed upon such commodity or container or in any way dispose of or commingle such commodity or container or prepare, pack, place, deliver for shipment, deliver for sale, sell, or cause to be loaded, shipped, or transported, any such commodity or container before it has been released by the sealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

12026.

(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided, any person violating any of the provisions of this division is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to violate any of the rules, regulations, tolerances, specifications, or standards adopted under the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 818, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12026.5.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the remedies or penalties provided by this division are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 527.)
-------------------------------------------

12027.

The secretary may make rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 21.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Administration [12100. - 12246.]



  ARTICLE 1. State Administration [12100. - 12108.]

12100.

Where not otherwise provided by law, the Department of Food and Agriculture has general supervision of the weights and measures and weighing and measuring devices sold or used in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 246, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12101.

The department shall investigate conditions in the various counties and cities in respect to weights and measures, and to the sale of goods, wares and merchandise, commodities and foodstuffs in containers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.

The department shall annually report to the Governor, and shall prior to each regular session report to the Legislature the work under this division, and shall make such recommendations as may be proper and necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.

The department shall keep a complete record of all of its acts, a record of prosecutions, and the reports of the various sealers. These records and reports shall be open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.5.

The duty of enforcing this division and carrying out its provisions and requirements is vested in the secretary and in each sealer acting under the supervision and direction of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 47.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.

(a) The department shall issue instructions and make recommendations to the county sealers, and the instructions and recommendations shall govern the procedure to be followed by these officers in the discharge of their duties.

(b) Instructions and recommendations that are made to ensure statewide weights and measures protection shall include a local administration cost analysis utilizing data provided by the county sealer. The cost analysis shall identify the joint programs or activities for which funds necessary to maintain adequate county administration and enforcement have not been provided. The secretary shall develop, jointly with the county
 sealers, county priorities for the enforcement programs and activities of the
 secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 275, Sec. 3.   (AB 1420)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.5.

The secretary may allocate annually to each county an amount determined by the secretary not to exceed one-third of the amount expended by the county pursuant to this division during the previous fiscal year for weights and measures programs. The allocation shall be made from funds appropriated to the secretary for the administration and enforcement of this division at the local level.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 23.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12105.

The department shall, at a frequency determined by the secretary, inspect the work of the local sealers and may inspect the weights, measures, balances, or any other weighing or measuring devices of any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 24.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12106.

The department shall, at least once annually and as often as requested by the Department of General Services or the executive officer of a state institution, test the scales, weights and measures used in checking the receipt and disbursement of supplies in any state institution, and shall report in writing its findings to the executive officer of the institution concerned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

12106.5.

The secretary may accept the testing and sealing of weighing and measuring devices by another state upon a finding that the requirements of California for testing and sealing such devices have been met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 25.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12107.

The secretary shall establish tolerances and specifications and other technical requirements for commercial weighing and measuring. In doing so, the secretary shall adopt, by reference, the latest standards as recommended by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published in the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 44 “Specifications, Tolerances, and Other Technical Requirements for Weighing and Measuring Devices,” except as specifically modified, amended, or rejected by regulation adopted by the secretary.

The secretary may, by regulation, establish tolerances and specifications for commercial weighing and measuring devices not included in Handbook 44.

Any regulation shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in conformity with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

It shall be unlawful for any person to violate any of the rules, regulations, tolerances, specifications, or standards established under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 27.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12107.1.

The secretary, by regulation, may establish a standard or standards of net weight or net measure, or net count of any commodity, except any manufactured commodity consisting of four or more staple ingredients. These standards, whenever applicable, shall be based upon published, official federal or state specifications and requirements or, in the absence of any published official specifications, upon established and accepted common usage. Any regulation shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in conformity with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

Whenever a standard, net weight, net measure, or net count has been established for any commodity,
 it is unlawful to sell the commodity by, at, or for a quantity greater or less than the standard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 27.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12108.

The secretary may arrange for the services of a sealer employed in a county on a collaborative basis and allow reasonable compensation and expenses for the purpose of performing services not already within his or her duties and that are subject to administration or enforcement by the department under the provisions of this code or of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 28.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Local Administration [12200. - 12215.]

12200.

There is in each county the office of county sealer of weights and measures. The county sealer shall be appointed by the board of supervisors, except in chartered counties where a different method of appointment is prescribed. The term of office of such sealer is four years from and after his appointment and until his successor is appointed but he may be removed as hereinafter provided.

In addition to his salary each sealer is entitled to his necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of his duties.

A county sealer may, with the consent of the power appointing him,
 appoint deputies or inspectors when necessary or expedient to carry out the duties of his office. Such deputies or inspectors shall serve at the pleasure of the county sealer.

The sealer may employ such clerks and employees as may be approved by the appointing power. Any such clerk or employee shall not have authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

A county may in its discretion refer to a deputy county sealer as a weights and measures inspector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.

If from any cause a vacancy occurs in the office of county sealer, the secretary upon learning of the vacancy shall immediately transmit to the board of supervisors or other appointing power a list of persons licensed by him or her for the position. If the appointing power fails to appoint a county sealer within 60 days after the receipt of the list, the secretary shall appoint a county sealer from that list. A person holding
 the position of Deputy State Sealer shall be appointed the county sealer of weights and measures for, and an employee of, the county to which he or she is assigned. The secretary shall issue to him or her a license that is valid only for the county he or she is serving. He or she shall become subject to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 29.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.1.

The salary and other compensation provided for the county sealer, deputy county sealers and inspectors and clerks shall be paid out of the county treasury in the same manner and at the same time as other county officers are paid. The county sealer, deputy county sealers and inspectors shall each be entitled to receive his traveling and incidental expenses incurred in the performance of his duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1600.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.2.

If the position of sealer cannot be filled by the board of supervisors or other appointing power or by the secretary as provided in Section 12201, then it shall be the duty of the secretary to perform the duties of sealer in the same manner, to the same extent, and with the same authority as if he or she had been the duly appointed sealer therein. The board of supervisors of the county shall reimburse the department for all
 expenses incurred by the secretary in fulfilling his or her responsibilities under the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 30.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12202.

(a) The secretary shall cause to be examined persons desiring to become county sealers, deputy county sealers, or inspectors and shall adopt rules and regulations governing these examinations given for the purpose of determining the fitness, experience, and qualifications of candidates for these positions. The secretary may provide for inspectors qualified to be employed in designated categories. Successful
 candidates shall be given a license that shall be good for five years unless revoked. Licenses of incumbent county sealers, deputy county sealers, or inspectors shall be renewed upon expiration without further examination.

(b) The secretary may charge each candidate a fee to cover the actual cost of providing the license examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 31.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12203.

Except as provided in this section, no person shall hereafter be appointed to the office of county sealer, deputy county sealer, or inspector unless he or she has a license issued by the secretary as provided in Section 12202. If there is no person available for the position of county sealer who holds a license, the appointing power may make a temporary appointment of a person recommended in writing by the secretary. If the
 appointing power does not make a temporary appointment and no person can be appointed from the eligible list by the secretary, then the secretary may make a temporary appointment of a person competent to carry on the duties of the office. Any temporary appointment shall be for a period not exceeding six months or until the next license examination is held. If the position of deputy county sealer or inspector cannot be filled from the lists, a temporary appointment may be made, upon the written recommendation of the secretary for a period not exceeding six months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 32.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12204.

In chartered counties providing for the civil service examination of sealers, deputy sealers, or inspectors the secretary shall issue a license without further examination upon presentation of a certificate showing the candidate has passed the examination. In these counties the board or commission responsible for the civil service examination may require a license from the secretary as a minimum qualification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 48.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12205.

For the purpose of receiving advice on the best and most efficacious methods of performing his or her duties and conducting his or her office, every county sealer serving in a county shall attend the annual meeting of the California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association and other meetings as the department or the board of supervisors requires.

The county sealer shall be
 allowed all actual and necessary traveling expenses incurred while on any service that requires him or her to go outside the county. Those expenses shall be a charge against the county in which the county sealer is employed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 33.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12206.

The jurisdiction of a county sealer appointed by a county or the secretary extends over the entire territorial limits of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 49.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12207.

The department shall furnish an identification card to each sealer. The identification card shall be of a form as prescribed by the department and shall be returned to the department by the sealer upon termination of his duties as a sealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

12209.

Every sealer shall:

(a) Carefully preserve all copies of the standards of weights and measures in his possession;

(b) Keep the copies in a safe and suitable place when not actually in use;

(c) Annually and at such other times as the department requires file with the department a written report of the work done by him, of the weights, measures, weighing and measuring instruments inspected or tested by him, the result of such inspection, of all prosecutions instituted by him for
 violations of the provisions of this division and of all other matters and things pertaining to his duties or which may be required by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12209.5.

Each sealer may, when so directed by the board of supervisors, issue and cause to be distributed to such persons as he may deem proper illustrative material or statements best adapted to insure the correct use of weights and measures and weighing and measuring devices and may prepare exhibits designed to inform the public for its protection of the duties performed by weights and measures officials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 303.)
-------------------------------------------

12209.6.

(a) A county sealer may test and certify the accuracy of all parking meters located in the county in which the sealer has jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, parking meters owned or operated by a city, county, or a city and county.

(b) If the county sealer determines that a specific parking meter is inaccurate, the sealer shall notify the owner or operator of the meter, may immediately close the meter, and any person may park a vehicle free of charge in the parking
 space to which the inaccurate meter corresponds until the owner or operator replaces or repairs the inaccurate parking meter.

(c) For purposes of this section, an “inaccurate parking meter” means a parking meter that provides less time than is paid for by a person using the metered parking space.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 511, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12209.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Correct” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12500.

(2) “Electric vehicle charger operated by a public agency” means an electric vehicle charger that is available for commercial use by the public and that is either owned by a public agency or for which the public agency has entered into an agreement to have the electric vehicle charger installed, maintained, or serviced, to have the revenues from the electric vehicle charger collected, or to otherwise have electric vehicle charging services performed on behalf of the public
 agency.

(3) “Incorrect” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12500.

(4) “Local publicly owned electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(5) “Public agency” means any city, county, city and county, district, or other local authority or public body of, or within, this state.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (g), a county sealer may test and verify as correct any electric vehicle charger operated by a public agency that is located in the county in which the sealer has jurisdiction.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (g), a county
 sealer, upon testing and finding that an electric vehicle charger operated by a public agency is incorrect, shall cause it to be marked with a tag or other suitable device with the words “out of order” and require the charger to be repaired or corrected within 30 days, subject to retesting and verification by the county sealer.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (g), a county sealer may levy a civil penalty, pursuant to Section 12015.3, against a public agency, or a vendor or entity contracted by a public agency to provide and maintain electric vehicle charger services on behalf of a public agency, that removes or obliterates any tag or device placed, or caused to be placed, by a sealer on an electric vehicle charger operated by the public agency. For purposes of levying a civil penalty under this subdivision, a person described in Section
 12015.3 includes a public agency and any contracted vendor or entity.

(e) Pursuant to Section 12240, a county board of supervisors may, by ordinance, charge an annual registration fee for the cost of inspecting and testing an electric vehicle charger, as authorized by this section.

(f) If a public agency owns an electric vehicle charger and leases the electric vehicle charger to another entity that operates the electric vehicle charger commercially, the entity that operates the electric vehicle charger commercially shall be the entity responsible for compliance with this section regarding that electric vehicle charger.

(g) (1) Subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) do not apply to an electric vehicle
 charger operated by a local publicly owned electric utility if the local publicly owned electric utility does all of the following:

(A) Is responsible for conducting field testing to validate the compliance with specification and user requirements and measurement and transactional accuracy of its commercial electric vehicle chargers that are available for public use.

(B) Uses field inspection and testing practices equivalent to the National Institute of Standards and Technology’s (NIST) Handbook 44 “Specifications, Tolerances, and other Technical Requirements for Weighing and Measuring Devices” inspection and
 test procedures for electric vehicle fueling systems and uses testing standards and equipment that are traceable to standards approved and maintained by the NIST or, in the absence of a standard approved and maintained by the NIST, a calibration laboratory accredited under the International Organization for Standardization (ISO) 17025 standard.

(C) Tests and conducts a field inspection for each electric vehicle charger at least once every six months in accordance with subparagraph (B).

(D) Documents the results of a test and field inspection described in subparagraph (C) and
 any action taken to address a failed test or field inspection, retains that documentation for at least two years, and makes that documentation available to any person or entity that submits a request for it pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(E) Conspicuously affixes a clear and legible identification notification on each electric vehicle charger that includes all of the following:

(i) The name and logo of the local publicly owned electric utility.

(ii) A statement that the electric vehicle charger is operated by the local publicly owned electric utility.

(iii) The
 local publicly owned electric utility’s customer service contact information for consumer comments, complaints, and questions.

(F) Sends a notice to the applicable county sealer indicating the local publicly owned electric utility’s intent to comply with this paragraph.

(2) If the county sealer finds that a local publicly owned electric utility is not in compliance with paragraph (1), the county sealer shall notify the utility director of the local publicly owned electric utility that is not in compliance and describe the areas of noncompliance. Within 30 days of receiving that notice, the local publicly owned electric utility shall respond to the county sealer and explain the actions taken by the local publicly owned electric utility to comply. If the local publicly owned
 electric utility fails to provide a response, the governing board of the local publicly owned electric utility shall discuss the notice of noncompliance at its next publicly noticed regular meeting.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 692, Sec. 1.   (AB 2037)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12210.

(a) Each sealer shall, within his or her county inspect, try and test all weights, scales, beams, measures of any kind, instruments or mechanical devices for weighing or measurements, and tools, appliances and accessories connected with any or all such instruments or measures, sold, or used by any proprietor, agent, lessee or employee for commercial purposes, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 12500.

(b) Each sealer shall, when so directed by the board of supervisors of his or her county, and only upon the written request of any person, firm or corporation,
 calibrate, test, weigh, and measure, and certify to the accuracy of, noncommercial weights and measures and weighing and measuring devices, and instruments, tools, and accessories connected therewith. The board of supervisors may authorize the sealer to establish from time to time a schedule of fees to cover the cost of such service and to charge and collect the fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 178, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12210.3.

(a) A county sealer who possesses the appropriate equipment to perform tests on water submeters shall inspect, test, and certify to the accuracy of a water submeter, within his or her county and upon written request of the owner, user, or operator of the water submeter, if any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The service is requested to be performed in addition to, or according to a schedule
 different from, any inspection frequency established by regulations adopted pursuant to Section 12212.

(2) The requested service pertains to a water submeter not intended to be placed into service in the county within six months.

(3) The requested service pertains to a water submeter intended to be placed into service in a different county.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 12210.5, the board of supervisors may authorize the sealer to establish, from time to time, a schedule of fees to cover the cost of services provided under subdivision (a) and to charge and collect the fees. The fee schedule shall be limited to the actual cost of performing those services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 539, Sec. 1.   (AB 2451)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12210.5.

(a) Any county which inspects or tests any weighing or measuring device or instrument used commercially, at the request of the owner or user of that device, when inspection or testing of the device could legally be performed by a registered service agency, as defined in Section 12531, may, if authorized by the county board of supervisors, collect from the requesting owner or user thereof a fee.

(b) That fee shall be based upon a uniform schedule of fees, which shall be prescribed by the secretary for use by the counties. The secretary shall prepare the schedule of fees to be comparable with the rates charged by the industry’s registered service agencies. All fees collected shall be credited to the general fund of the county in which collected and used only for the administration and enforcement of laws pertaining to weights and measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 662, Sec. 1.   (AB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12210.7.

A county sealer shall, within his or her county and upon written request of the owner, user, or operator of the water submeter, authorize the installation of a water submeter that has been inspected, tested, and sealed by the county sealer of another county if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The meter bears a seal that represents the most recent seal of the county in which the water submeter was inspected, in
 accordance with the provisions of Section 12505.

(b) The water submeter is installed no later than 12 months after the water submeter was inspected, tested, and sealed.

(c) The county sealer does not have reason to believe the water submeter has been tampered with, damaged, or otherwise rendered inoperable since the inspection, testing, and sealing by the other county sealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 539, Sec. 2.   (AB 2451)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12211.

Each sealer shall, from time to time, weigh or measure packages, containers, or amounts of commodities sold, or in the process of delivery, in order to determine whether they contain the quantity or amount represented and whether they are being sold in accordance with law.

The secretary shall adopt necessary regulations governing the procedures to be followed by sealers in connection with the weighing or measuring of amounts of commodities in individual packages, containers, or lots of packages or containers, including the procedures for sampling a lot, and for determining whether any package, container, or a lot of packages or containers complies with this section.

In
 adopting those regulations, the secretary shall adopt by reference the package checking procedures recommended by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published in the current edition of the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 133, “Checking the Net Contents of Packaged Goods,” and any subsequent amendments thereto, except insofar as those requirements are specifically modified, amended, or rejected by a regulation adopted by the secretary.

Any lot, package, or container of any commodity that conforms to this section shall be deemed to be in conformity with this division relating to stated net weights or measures.

Whenever a lot, package, or container of any commodity is found to contain, through the procedures authorized in this section, a less amount than that represented, the sealer
 shall order, in writing, that lot, package, or container of commodity off sale and require that an accurate statement of quantity be placed on each package or container before it may be released for sale by the sealer in writing. The sealer may seize as evidence any package or container that is found to contain a less amount than that represented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 28.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12212.

(a) The secretary shall adopt necessary regulations governing the inspection frequency of all commercially used weights, measures, and weighing and measuring apparatus in the state.

(b) The sealer of each county shall perform such inspections as may be required by the secretary. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the sealer
 from inspecting a device more frequently than required if he or she deems those tests to be necessary.

(c) Any regulation shall be adopted by the secretary in conformity with the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.
